New Mexico, session 2026, HB12.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. [NEW MATERIAL] SHORT TITLE.--Sections 1 and 2 of this act may be cited as the "Physical Therapy Licensure Compact". SECTION 2. [NEW MATERIAL] PHYSICAL THERAPY LICENSURE COMPACT ENTERED INTO.--The Physical Therapy Licensure Compact is entered into law and entered into with all other jurisdictions legally joining therein in a form substantially as follows: "PHYSICAL THERAPY LICENSURE COMPACT ARTICLE 1 - Definitions As used in the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact, and except as otherwise provided, the following definitions shall apply: A. "active duty military" means full-time duty status in the active uniformed service of the United States, including members of the national guard and reserve on active duty orders pursuant to 10 U.S.C. Chapters 1209 and 1211; B. "adverse action" means disciplinary action taken by a physical therapy licensing board based on misconduct, unacceptable performance or a combination of both; C. "alternative program" means a nondisciplinary monitoring or practice remediation process approved by a physical therapy licensing board. This includes, but is not limited to, substance abuse issues; D. "compact privilege" means the authorization granted by a remote state to allow a licensee from another member state to practice as a physical therapist or work as a physical therapist assistant in the remote state under its laws and rules. The practice of physical therapy occurs in the member state where the patient or client is located at the time of the patient or client encounter; E. "continuing competence" means a requirement, as a condition of license renewal, to provide evidence of participation in, or completion of, educational and professional activities relevant to practice or area of work; F. "data system" means a repository of information about licensees, including examination, licensure, investigative, compact privilege and adverse action; G. "encumbered license" means a license that a physical therapy licensing board has limited in any way; H. "executive board" means a group of directors elected or appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, the commission; I. "home state" means the member state that is the licensee's primary state of residence; J. "investigative information" means information, records and documents received or generated by a physical therapy licensing board pursuant to an investigation; K. "jurisprudence requirement" means the assessment of an individual's knowledge of the laws and rules governing the practice of physical therapy in a state; L. "licensee" means an individual who currently holds an authorization from the state to practice as a physical therapist or to work as a physical therapist assistant; M. "member state" means a state that has enacted the compact; N. "party state" means any member state in which a licensee holds a current license or compact privilege or is applying for a license or compact privilege; O. "physical therapist" means an individual who is licensed by a state to practice physical therapy; P. "physical therapist assistant" means an individual who is licensed or certified by a state and who assists the physical therapist in selected components of physical therapy; Q. "physical therapy", "physical therapy practice" or "the practice of physical therapy" means the care and services provided by or under the direction and supervision of a licensed physical therapist; R. "physical therapy compact commission", "compact commission" or "commission" means the national administrative body whose membership consists of all states that have enacted the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact; S. "physical therapy licensing board" or "licensing board" means the agency of a state that is responsible for the licensing and regulation of physical therapists and physical therapist assistants; T. "remote state" means a member state other than the home state in which a licensee is exercising or seeking to exercise the compact privilege; U. "rule" means a regulation, principle or directive promulgated by the commission that has the force of law; and V. "state" means any state, commonwealth, district or territory of the United States of America that regulates the practice of physical therapy. ARTICLE 2 - State Participation in Compact A. Each member state shall enforce the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact and shall take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate the compact's purposes and intent. The provisions of that compact and the rules promulgated pursuant to that compact shall have standing as law but shall not override existing state authority to regulate the practice of physical therapy. B. All courts shall give deference and take judicial notice of the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact and rules promulgated pursuant to that compact in any judicial or administrative proceeding in a member state pertaining to the subject matter of that compact that may affect the powers, responsibilities or actions of the physical therapy compact commission. C. The physical therapy compact commission shall be entitled to receive all services of process in such proceeding and shall have standing to intervene in the proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide service of process to the compact commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the compact commission, the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact or promulgated rules. D. To participate in the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact, a state must: (1) participate fully in the commission's data system, including using the commission's unique identifier as defined in rules; (2) have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints about licensees; (3) notify the commission, in compliance with the terms of the compact and rules, of any adverse action or the availability of investigative information regarding a licensee; (4) fully implement a criminal background check requirement, within a time frame established by rule, by receiving the results of the federal bureau of investigation record search on criminal background checks and using the results in making licensure decisions in accordance with Subsection B of this article; (5) comply with the rules of the commission; (6) use a recognized national examination as a requirement for licensure pursuant to the rules of the commission; and (7) have continuing competence requirements as a condition for license renewal. E. Upon adoption of this compact, the member state shall have the authority to obtain biometric-based information from each physical therapy licensure applicant and submit this information to the federal bureau of investigation for a criminal background check in accordance with 28 U.S.C. Section 534 and 42 U.S.C. Section 14616. F. A member state shall grant the compact privilege to a licensee holding a valid unencumbered license in another member state in accordance with the terms of the compact and rules. G. Member states may charge a fee for granting a compact privilege. ARTICLE 3 - Compact Privilege A. To exercise the compact privilege under the terms and provisions of the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact, the licensee shall: (1) hold a license in the home state; (2) have no encumbrance on any state license; (3) be eligible for a compact privilege in any member state in accordance with Subsections D, G and H of this article; (4) have not had any adverse action against any license or compact privilege within the previous two years; (5) notify the commission that the licensee is seeking the compact privilege within a remote state; (6) pay applicable fees, including any state fee, for the compact privilege; (7) meet jurisprudence requirements established by the remote states in which the licensee is seeking a compact privilege; and (8) report to the commission adverse action taken by a nonmember state within thirty days from the date the adverse action is taken. B. The compact privilege is valid until the expiration date of the home license. The licensee must comply with the requirements of Subsection A of this article to maintain the compact privilege in the remote state. C. A licensee providing physical therapy in a remote state under the compact privilege shall function within the laws and rules of the remote state. D. A licensee providing physical therapy in a remote state is subject to that state's regulatory authority. A remote state may, in accordance with due process and that state's laws, remove a licensee's compact privilege in the remote state for a specific period of time, impose fines or take any other necessary actions to protect the health and safety of its citizens. The licensee is not eligible for a compact privilege in a member state until the specific time for removal has passed and all fines are paid. E. If a home state license is encumbered, the licensee shall lose the compact privilege in any remote state until the following occur: (1) the home state license is no longer encumbered; and (2) two years have elapsed from the date of the adverse action. F. Once an encumbered license in the home state is restored to good standing, the licensee must meet the requirements of Subsection A of this article to obtain a compact privilege in any remote state. G. If a licensee's compact privilege in any remote state is removed, the individual shall lose the compact privilege in any remote state until the following occur: (1) the specific period of time for which the compact privilege was removed has ended; (2) all fines have been paid; and (3) two years have elapsed from the date of the adverse action. H. Once the requirements of Subsection G of this article have been met, the licensee must meet the requirements in Subsection A of this article to obtain a compact privilege in a remote state. ARTICLE 4 - Active Duty Military Personnel or Their Spouses A licensee who is active duty military or is the spouse of an individual who is active duty military may designate one of the following as the home state: A. home of record; B. permanent change of station; or C. state of current residence if it is different than the permanent change of station state or home of record. ARTICLE 5 - Adverse Actions A. A home state shall have exclusive power to impose adverse action against a license issued by the home state. B. A home state may take adverse action based on the investigative information of a remote state so long as the home state follows its own procedures for imposing adverse action. C. Nothing in the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact shall override a member state's decision that participation in an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse action and that such participation shall remain nonpublic if required by the member state's laws. Member states must require licensees who enter any alternative programs in lieu of discipline to agree not to practice in any other member state during the term of the alternative program without prior authorization from such other member state. D. Any member state may investigate actual or alleged violations of the statutes and rules authorizing the practice of physical therapy in any other member state in which a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant holds a license or compact privilege. E. A remote state shall have the authority to: (1) take adverse actions as set forth in Subsection D of Article 3 of the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact against a licensee's compact privilege in the state; (2) issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a physical therapy licensing board in a party state for the attendance and testimony of witnesses, or the production of evidence from another party state, shall be enforced in the latter state by any court of competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before it. The issuing authority shall pay witness fees, travel expenses, mileage and other fees required by the service statutes of the state where the witnesses or evidence are located; and (3) if otherwise permitted by state law, recover from the licensee the costs of investigations and disposition of cases resulting from any adverse action taken against that licensee. F. Joint Investigations (1) In addition to the authority granted to a member state by its respective physical therapy practice act or other applicable state law, a member state may participate with other member states in joint investigations of licensees. (2) Member states shall share investigative, litigation or compliance materials in furtherance of any joint or individual investigation initiated under the compact. ARTICLE 6 - Establishment of the Physical Therapy Compact Commission A. The compact member states hereby create and establish a joint public agency known as the "physical therapy compact commission". (1) The commission is an instrumentality of the compact states. (2) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the commission is located. The commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. (3) Nothing in the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity. B. Membership, Voting and Meetings (1) Each member state shall have and be limited to one delegate selected by that member state's licensing board. (2) The delegate shall be a current member of the licensing board, who is a physical therapist, physical therapist assistant, public member or the board administrator. (3) Any delegate may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the law of the state from which the delegate is appointed. (4) The member state board shall fill any vacancy occurring in the commission. (5) Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote with regard to the promulgation of rules and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate in the business and affairs of the commission. (6) A delegate shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates' participation in meetings by telephone or other means of communication. (7) The commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws. C. The commission shall have the following powers and duties: (1) establish the fiscal year of the commission; (2) establish bylaws; (3) maintain the commission's financial records in accordance with the bylaws; (4) meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this compact and the bylaws; (5) promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and coordinate implementation and administration of this compact. The rules shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in all member states; (6) bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of the commission; provided that the standing of any state physical therapy licensing board to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected; (7) purchase and maintain insurance and bonds; (8) borrow, accept or contract for services of personnel, including, but not limited to, employees of a member state; (9) hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the compact and to establish the commission's personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel and other related personnel matters; (10) accept appropriate donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services and receive, use and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest; (11) lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of, or otherwise own, hold, improve or use, any property, real, personal or mixed; provided that at all times the commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety; (12) sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon or otherwise dispose of property real, personal or mixed; (13) establish a budget and make expenditures; (14) borrow money; (15) appoint committees, including standing committees composed of members, state regulators, state legislators or their representatives and consumer representatives and such other interested persons as may be designated in this compact and the bylaws; (16) provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law enforcement agencies; (17) establish and elect an executive board; and (18) perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this compact consistent with the state regulation of physical therapy licensure and practice. D. The Executive Board The executive board shall have the power to act on behalf of the commission according to the terms of this compact. (1) The executive board shall be composed of nine members: (a) seven voting members who are elected by the commission from the current membership of the commission; (b) one ex-officio, nonvoting member from the recognized national physical therapy professional association; and (c) one ex-officio, nonvoting member from the recognized membership organization of the physical therapy licensing boards. (2) The ex-officio members will be selected by their respective organizations. (3) The commission may remove a member of the executive board as provided in bylaws. (4) The executive board shall meet at least annually. (5) The executive board shall have the following duties and responsibilities: (a) recommend to the entire commission changes to the rules or bylaws, changes to this compact legislation, fees paid by compact member states such as annual dues and any commission compact fee charged to licensees for the compact privilege; (b) ensure that compact administration services are appropriately provided, contractual or otherwise; (c) prepare and recommend the budget; (d) maintain financial records on behalf of the commission; (e) monitor compact compliance of member states and provide compliance reports to the commission; (f) establish additional committees as necessary; and (g) perform other duties as provided in rules or bylaws. E. Meetings of the Commission (1) All meetings shall be open to the public, and public notice of meetings shall be given in the same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in Article 8 of the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact. (2) The commission or the executive board or other committees of the commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting if the commission or executive board or other committees of the commission must discuss: (a) noncompliance of a member state with its obligations under the compact; (b) the employment, compensation, discipline or other matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees or other matters related to the commission's internal personnel practices and procedures; (c) current, threatened or reasonably anticipated litigation; (d) negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease or sale of goods, services or real estate; (e) accusation of any person of a crime or formally censuring any person; (f) disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or confidential; (g) disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy; (h) disclosure of investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes; (i) disclosure of information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the commission or other committee charged with responsibility of investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to the compact; or (j) matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or member state statute. (3) If a meeting or portion of a meeting is closed pursuant to this provision, the commission's legal counsel or designee shall certify that the meeting may be closed and shall reference each relevant exempting provision. (4) The commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action shall be identified in the minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority vote of the commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction. F. Financing of the Commission (1) The commission shall pay or provide for the payment of the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization and ongoing activities. (2) The commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources, donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services. (3) The commission may levy and collect an annual assessment from each member state or impose fees on other parties to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each year for which revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated based upon a formula to be determined by the commission, which shall promulgate a rule binding upon all member states. (4) The commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the commission pledge the credit of any of the member states, except by and with the authority of the member state. (5) The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the commission shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the commission. G. Qualified Immunity, Defense and Indemnification (1) The members, officers, executive director, employees and representatives of the commission shall be immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred, within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The liability of the interstate commission within any member state may not exceed the limits of liability set forth under the constitution and laws of that state for state officials, employees and agents. The interstate commission is considered to be an instrumentality of the states for the purpose of any such action. (2) The commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director, employee or representative of the commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining that person's own counsel; and provided further that the actual or alleged act, error or omission did not result from that person's intentional or willful or wanton misconduct. (3) The commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer, executive director, employee or representative of the commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that the actual or alleged act, error or omission did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. ARTICLE 7 - Data System A. The commission shall provide for the development, maintenance and use of a coordinated database and reporting system containing licensure, adverse action and investigative information on all licensed individuals in member states. B. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a member state shall submit a uniform data set to the data system on all individuals to whom the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact is applicable as required by the rules of the commission, including: (1) identifying information; (2) licensure data; (3) adverse actions against a license or compact privilege; (4) non-confidential information related to alternative program participation; (5) any denial of application for licensure and the reasons for such denial; and (6) other information that may facilitate the administration of this compact, as determined by the rules of the commission. C. Investigative information pertaining to a licensee in any member state shall be available only to other party states. D. The commission shall promptly notify all member states of any adverse action taken against a licensee or an individual applying for a license. Adverse action information pertaining to a licensee in any member state shall be available to any other member state. E. Member states contributing information to the data system may designate information that may not be shared with the public without the express permission of the contributing state. F. Any information submitted to the data system that is subsequently required to be expunged by the laws of the member state contributing the information shall be removed from the data system. G. All information provided to the interstate commission or distributed by member boards shall be confidential, filed under seal and used only for investigatory or disciplinary matters; provided that information submitted to the physical therapy board is subject to the confidentiality and transparency requirements imposed by New Mexico law or court order. ARTICLE 8 - Rulemaking A. The commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth in this article and the rules adopted pursuant to the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact. Rules and amendments shall become binding as of the date specified in each rule or amendment. B. If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the compact within four years of the date of adoption of the rule, then such rule shall have no further force and effect in any member state. C. Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the commission. D. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules by the commission, and at least thirty days in advance of the meeting at which the rule will be considered and voted upon, the commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking on the websites of: (1) the commission or other publicly accessible platform; and (2) each member state physical therapy licensing board or other publicly accessible platform or the publication in which each state would otherwise publish proposed rules. E. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include: (1) the proposed time, date and location of the meeting in which the rule will be considered and voted upon; (2) the text of the proposed rule or amendment and the reason for the proposed rule; (3) a request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and (4) the manner in which interested persons may submit notice to the commission of their intention to attend the public hearing and any written comments. F. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the commission shall allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions and arguments that shall be made available to the public. G. The commission shall grant an opportunity for a public hearing before it adopts a rule or amendment if a hearing is requested by: (1) at least twenty-five persons; (2) a state or federal governmental subdivision or agency; or (3) an association having at least twenty-five members. H. If a hearing is held on the proposed rule or amendment, the commission shall publish the place, time and date of the scheduled public hearing. If the hearing is held via electronic means, the commission shall publish the mechanism for access to the electronic hearing. (1) All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing shall notify in writing the executive director of the commission or other designated member of their desire to appear and testify at the hearing not less than five business days before the scheduled date of the hearing. (2) Hearings shall be conducted in a manner that provides each person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in writing. (3) All hearings shall be recorded. A copy of the recording shall be made available on request. (4) Nothing in this article shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the commission at hearings required by this article. I. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was not held, the commission shall consider all written and oral comments received. J. If no written notice of intent to attend the public hearing by interested parties is received, the commission may proceed with promulgation of the proposed rule without a public hearing. K. The commission, by majority vote of all members, shall take final action on the proposed rule and shall determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule. L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule without prior notice, opportunity for comment or hearing; provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the compact and in this article shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety days after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to: (1) meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or welfare; (2) prevent a loss of commission or member state funds; (3) meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule that is established by federal law or rule; or (4) protect public health and safety. M. The commission or an authorized committee of the commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the chair of the commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision shall take effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision shall not take effect without the approval of the commission. ARTICLE 9 - Oversight, Dispute Resolution and Enforcement A. Oversight (1) The executive, legislative and judicial branches of state government in each member state shall enforce the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate the compact's purposes and intent. The provisions of the compact and the rules promulgated pursuant to the compact shall have standing as statutory law. (2) All courts shall take judicial notice of the compact and the rules in any judicial or administrative proceeding in a member state pertaining to the subject matter of the compact that may affect the powers, responsibilities or actions of the commission. (3) The commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any such proceeding and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide service of process to the commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the commission, the compact or promulgated rules. B. Default, Technical Assistance and Termination (1) If the commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under the compact or the promulgated rules, the commission shall provide: (a) written notice to the defaulting state and other member states of the nature of the default, the proposed means of curing the default or any other action to be taken by the commission; and (b) remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default. (2) If a member state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be terminated from the compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the member states, and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending member state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default. (3) Termination of membership in the compact shall be imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the commission to the governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting member state's legislature and each of the member states. (4) A member state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination. (5) The commission shall not bear any costs related to a member state that is found to be in default or that has been terminated from the compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the commission and the defaulting state. (6) The defaulting member state may appeal the action of the commission by petitioning the United States district court for the District of Columbia, a federal court of New Mexico or the federal district where the commission has its principal offices. The prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney fees. C. Dispute Resolution (1) Upon request by a member state, the commission shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the compact that arise among member states and between member and nonmember states. (2) The commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate. D. Enforcement (1) The commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of the compact. (2) By majority vote, the commission may initiate legal action in the United States district court for the District of Columbia, a federal court of New Mexico or the federal district where the commission has its principal offices against a member state in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event that judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney fees. (3) The remedies provided in this article shall not be the exclusive remedies of the commission. The commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law. ARTICLE 10 - Date of Implementation of the Interstate Commission for Physical Therapy Practice and Associated Rules, Withdrawal and Amendment A. The Physical Therapy Licensure Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the compact statute is enacted into law in the tenth member state. The provisions, which become effective at that time, shall be limited to the powers granted to the commission relating to assembly and the promulgation of rules. Thereafter, the commission shall meet and exercise rulemaking powers necessary to the implementation and administration of the compact. B. Any state that joins the compact subsequent to the commission's initial adoption of the rules shall be subject to the rules as they exist on the date on which the compact becomes law in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the compact becomes law in that state. C. Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the compact. (1) A member state's withdrawal shall not take effect until six months after enactment of the repealing statute. (2) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing member state's physical therapy licensing board to comply with the investigative and adverse action reporting requirements of this compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal. D. Nothing contained in the compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any physical therapy licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a member state and a nonmember state that does not conflict with the provisions of the compact. E. The compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to the compact shall become effective and binding upon any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all member states. ARTICLE 11 - Construction and Severability The Physical Therapy Licensure Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate its purposes. The provisions of the compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of the compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any party state or of the United States or its applicability to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of the compact and its applicability to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected. If the compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any party state, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining party states and in full force and effect as to the party state affected as to all severable matters. ARTICLE 12 - Preservation of State Authority A. This compact creates a new pathway for physical therapy licensure in this state but does not otherwise change or limit the effect of the Physical Therapy Act. B. This compact adopts the prevailing standard for licensure and affirms that the practice of physical therapy occurs where the patient is located at the time of a physical therapy patient encounter and, therefore, requires the physical therapist to be under the jurisdiction of the state physical therapy board where the patient is located. C. A state physical therapy board that participates in this compact retains the authority to impose an adverse action against a license to practice physical therapy in that state, including licenses issued to physical therapists through procedures provided by this compact. ARTICLE 13 - BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT A. Nothing in this compact prevents the enforcement of any other law of a participating state that is not inconsistent with this compact. B. Any laws in a participating state in conflict with this compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict. C. All agreements between the commission and the participating states are binding in accordance with their terms. D. If any provision of this compact exceeds the constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any member state, such provision shall be ineffective to the extent of the conflict with the constitutional provision in question in that member state.". SECTION 3. Section 61-12D-1 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1997, Chapter 89, Section 1) is amended to read: "61-12D-1. SHORT TITLE.--[This act] Chapter 61, Article 12D NMSA 1978 may be cited as the "Physical Therapy Act"." SECTION 4. Section 61-12D-5 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1997, Chapter 89, Section 5, as amended) is amended to read: "61-12D-5. POWERS AND DUTIES--CRIMINAL HISTORY BACKGROUND CHECKS.--The board: A. shall examine all applicants for licensure to practice physical therapy and issue licenses or permits to those who are duly qualified; B. shall regulate the practice of physical therapy by interpreting and enforcing the provisions of the Physical Therapy Act; C. may promulgate rules in accordance with the State Rules Act to carry out the provisions of the Physical Therapy Act; D. may meet as often as it deems necessary. A majority of the members constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business. The board shall keep an official record of all its proceedings; E. may establish requirements for assessing continuing competency; F. may collect fees; G. may elect such officers as it deems necessary for the operations and obligations of the board. Terms of office shall be one year; H. shall provide for the timely orientation and training of new professional and public appointees to the board, including training in licensing and disciplinary procedures and orientation to all statutes, rules, policies and procedures of the board; I. may establish ad hoc committees and pay per diem and mileage to the members; J. may enter into contracts; K. may deny, suspend or revoke a license or take other disciplinary action in accordance with the Uniform Licensing Act; L. shall report final disciplinary action taken against a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant to the national disciplinary database; M. shall publish at least annually final disciplinary action taken against any physical therapist or physical therapist assistant; [and] N. may prescribe the forms of license certificates, application forms and such other documents as it deems necessary to carry out the provisions of the Physical Therapy Act; O. shall prescribe procedures, forms and manner of submitting an applicant's full set of fingerprints for state and federal criminal history background reports that the board uses to evaluate the applicant's qualification for licensure; and P. shall require an applicant, as a condition of eligibility for initial licensure or initial privilege to practice under the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact, to submit a full set of fingerprints to the department of public safety to obtain state and national criminal history record information on the applicant. State and national criminal history record reports are confidential and not public records. The board shall not disseminate criminal history record information across state lines." SECTION 5. A new section of the Physical Therapy Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] PARTICIPATION IN PHYSICAL THERAPY LICENSURE COMPACT AS CONDITION OF EMPLOYMENT PROHIBITED.--An employer shall not require a physical therapist licensed in this state pursuant to the Physical Therapy Act to seek licensure through the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact as a condition of initial or continued employment as a physical therapist in this state. An employer may require that a physical therapist obtain and maintain a license to practice physical therapy in multiple states if the physical therapist is free to obtain and maintain the licenses by any means authorized by the laws of the respective states." SECTION 6. A new section of the Physical Therapy Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] PHYSICAL THERAPY LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION--COMMISSIONER DUTIES.-- A. If a meeting, or a portion of a meeting, of the physical therapy compact commission is closed pursuant to Paragraph (2) of Subsection E of Article 6 of the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact, commissioners appointed to represent New Mexico on the commission shall request the commission's legal counsel or designee to certify that the meeting may be closed by citing each provision of that paragraph that is applicable. Commissioners may satisfy this section by making a motion, or voting in the affirmative on a motion, to have the physical therapy compact commission's legal counsel or designee certify that the meeting may be closed. B. Any time the physical therapy compact commission is voting on what to include in the commission's minutes, commissioners appointed to represent New Mexico on the commission shall vote to include in the minutes: (1) all actions taken by the commission and the reasons for each action, including a description of the views expressed; and (2) identification of all documents considered by the commission that relate to an action taken by the commission." SECTION 7. A new section of the Physical Therapy Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] BOARD OBLIGATIONS--PUBLIC POSTING.--The board shall post on the board's public website: A. copies of the physical therapy compact commission's current bylaws and rules; B. notice of any physical therapy compact commission action that may affect the license of a physical therapist in this state within thirty days of the commission's action being taken; and C. any minutes or documents of the physical therapy compact commission that are released pursuant to a vote of the commission. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting of the physical therapy compact commission shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority vote of the commission or an order of a court of competent jurisdiction." SECTION 8. A new section of the Physical Therapy Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] JOINT INVESTIGATIONS--INVESTIGATIVE SUBPOENAS.--The board may enter into joint investigations with other state physical therapist boards pursuant to the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact; provided that participation in the joint investigation is governed by a written agreement among the board and the other participating physical therapist boards." SECTION 9. CONTINGENT REPEAL.-- A. Sections 1, 2 and 5 through 8 of this act are repealed if a state or federal court of New Mexico finds that a rule or decision of the physical therapy compact commission or a court order regarding a rule or decision relating to the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact would change the scope of practice of a physical therapist or the definition of "unprofessional conduct" for a physical therapist in a manner that is inconsistent with the Physical Therapy Act or any other state law relating to the practice of physical therapy. A person who is or may be affected by a rule or decision at issue under this subsection shall have standing to seek a determination by the district court. B. The physical therapy board shall certify to the director of the legislative council service and the executive director of the New Mexico compilation commission the date on which the action described in Subsection A of this section occurs. C. Repeal of the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact pursuant to this section constitutes this state's immediate withdrawal from the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact. The physical therapy board shall send written notification of withdrawal to the governor of each other state that has enacted the compact. D. The physical therapy board, or a member of the legislature, may request in writing that the attorney general review the actions of the physical therapy compact commission or a court ruling relating to the enforcement of the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact. E. In the event of a repeal pursuant to this section, the provisions of Article 10 of the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact shall remain in effect and govern the withdrawal. - 41 -